tests/runtime/strings.sbl
// Test strings

externals (stem)

strings (s)

define stem as (
  '' or fail='failed to match empty string'
  test 'o' or fail='failed to match 1-char string'
  test ('o' $(cursor == 1)) or fail='failed to update cursor after 1-char string match'
  test 'ok' or fail='failed to match string'
  test ('ok' $(cursor == 2)) or fail='failed to update cursor after string match'
  test ('ok' $(cursor == 2) atlimit) or fail='atlimit failed after string match'
  not 'x' or fail='incorrectly matched single character string'
  not 'ko' or fail='incorrectly matched string'
  $(cursor == 0) or fail='cursor not restored after string literal tests'

  $s=''
  s or fail='failed to match empty string var'
  $s='o'
  test s or fail='failed to match 1-char string var'
  test (s $(cursor == 1)) or fail='failed to update cursor after 1-char string var match'
  $s='ok'
  test s or fail='failed to match string var'
  test (s $(cursor == 2)) or fail='failed to update cursor after string var match'
  test (s $(cursor == 2) atlimit) or fail='atlimit failed after string var match'
  $s='x' not s or fail='incorrectly matched single character string var'
  $s='ko' not s or fail='incorrectly matched string var'

  do (
    ='test'
  )
  $(cursor == 0) or fail='cursor not restored by do'

  backwards (
    do (
      ='test'
    )
    $(cursor == size) or fail='cursor not restored by do'
  )

  ='abcde'
  test ( $(len == 5) $(cursor == 0) 'abcde' atlimit ) or fail='string assignment wrong'

  setlimit hop 4 for test (next ='nkl')
  test ( $(len == 5) $(cursor == 0) 'ankle' atlimit ) or fail='string assignment does not replace c:l (same len)'

  setlimit hop 4 for test (next ='x')
  test ( $(len == 3) $(cursor == 0) 'axe' atlimit ) or fail='string assignment does not replace c:l (shorter)'

  setlimit hop 2 for test (next ='ustralopithecin')
  test ( $(len == 17) $(cursor == 0) 'australopithecine' atlimit ) or fail='string assignment does not replace c:l (longer)'

  // Test string literals are properly escaped for various target languages.
  $s='$xxx \x42 \u0042 \u{0042} \u000a {$xxx}' $(lenof s == 39) or fail='bad target language string literal escaping'

  // Test ASCII control characters in string literals
  stringescapes {}
  $s='{U+A}{U+1F}{U+7F}{U+0}x' $(lenof s == 5) or fail='ASCII control characters not handled'
  $s='a{U+80}{U+A0}b{U+00FF}' $(lenof s == 5) or fail='Unicode characters not handled'

  // Test that using a C close-comment sequence doesn't trip anything up.
  not '*/' or fail='C close comment sequence mishandled'

  ='ok'
)
